Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.660.035

Partnership programs—Priority assistance in advancing cultural competency skills.

The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall identify school districts that have the most significant academic disparities among subgroups of students and for large numbers of those students, and districts that should receive priority for assistance in advancing cultural competency skills in their workforce. The Washington professional educator standards board shall provide assistance to the identified school districts to develop partnership programs between the districts and teacher preparation programs to provide alternative route programs under RCW 28A.660.020 and to recruit paraeducators and other persons in the local community to become certificated as teachers. An alternative route partnership program proposed by an identified school district shall receive priority eligibility for partnership grants under RCW 28A.660.020. To the maximum extent possible, the board shall coordinate the recruiting Washington teachers program under RCW 28A.415.370 with the alternative route partnership programs under this section.

[ 2019 c 295 s 107; 2017 c 14 s 2; 2009 c 468 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28A.310.235.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28B.10.033.

Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28B.102.030.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.415.265.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.180.120.

Findings—Intent—2009 c 468: See note following RCW 28A.300.136.